Utah statutes.
10-2-610.   Canvass of election -- Notice of results -- Filing of notice and
plat -- Recording requirements.
(1)  The legislative body of each county in which a proposed consolidating
municipality is located shall canvass the results of the election or elections
in the same manner as for general elections and shall certify the results of
the election to the county clerk or clerks.
(2)  If a majority of the ballots cast at the election on consolidation in
each municipality are for consolidation, the county clerk or clerks shall
immediately, on receiving notice of the results of the canvass under
Subsection (1), give notice of the result by publication in the same manner
and for the same time as provided in Section 10-2-608.
(3)  The mayors of the municipalities to be consolidated shall:
(a)  within 30 days after the canvass of an election at which voters approve
consolidation, file with the lieutenant governor:
(i)  a copy of a notice of an impending boundary action, as defined in Section
67-1a-6.5, that meets the requirements of Subsection 67-1a-6.5(3); and
(ii)  a copy of an approved final local entity plat, as defined in Section
67-1a-6.5; and
(b)  upon the lieutenant governor's issuance of a certificate of consolidation
under Section 67-1a-6.5:
(i)  if the consolidated municipality is located within the boundary of a
single county, submit to the recorder of that county the original:
(A)  notice of an impending boundary action;
(B)  certificate of consolidation; and
(C)  approved final local entity plat; or
(ii)  if the consolidated municipality is located within the boundaries of
more than a single county, submit the original of the documents listed in
Subsections (3)(b)(i)(A), (B), and (C) to the recorder of one of those
counties and a certified copy of those documents to the recorder of each other
county.
